Illinois, session 104th, SB657.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Veterans' and Military Discount Program Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (330 ILCS 140/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Veterans' and Military Discount Program Act.9(Source: P.A. 99-374, eff. 8-17-15.)